Tennessee, session 114, SB1523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (28).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-249(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Inmate disciplinary oversight board, created by § 41-21-1002;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1523
010080
- 1 -